Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 20 Rodeo Animals and Livestock

4-20-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish guidelines and criteria for rodeo and rodeo related activities relative to humane treatment of rodeo animals and rodeo livestock in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 661, § 1.

4-20-2.
Notification requirements.

No person, firm, corporation, or association shall conduct or promote any rodeo without first having notified in writing the animal control officer of the city or town in which this event is to take place. The notification shall include the dates and times of this event and the identity of the person who has charge of this event.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 661, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 245, § 1.

4-20-3.
Presence of veterinarian required.

No person, firm, corporation, or association shall conduct or promote any rodeo without requiring the presence of a veterinarian licensed to practice in Rhode Island during the time that this event is taking place. The veterinarian employed shall be one who has had experience in the treatment of large animal life for a period of not less than two (2) years. All expenses incurred for the presence of and services rendered by the veterinarian employed shall be the responsibility of the promoter of the event.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 661, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 245, § 1.

4-20-4.
Rodeo events.

Rodeo events involving animals/livestock shall be limited to bareback riding, saddle bronk riding, bull riding, calf roping, as provided in §

4-20-7

, breakaway calf-roping, steer wrestling, team riding, barrel racing, team roping, wild horse racing, chuckwagon racing, quarter horse races, mounted flag races, trail riding events, obstacle course and pole bending events. This shall include any nonpublic practice or point gathering events which are conducted prior to or subsequent to any public performances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 661, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 245, § 1.

4-20-5.
Duties of veterinarian in charge.

The appointed veterinarian, once appointed to oversee any rodeo, shall have access to the complete site of any activity involving animals to be employed in the event. The veterinarian shall have complete authority over the treatment and use of any animal that becomes injured in this event. The veterinarian shall have the right to declare any animal unfit for use in any such event and his or her decision shall be final after that decision has been communicated to the person in charge, as communicated to the animal control officer in §

4-20-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 245, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 49.

4-20-6.
Presence required during any event.

The person in charge, as communicated to the animal control officer in accordance with §

4-20-1

, is required to be present and available for communication while the event is taking place. In the event that the person in charge, as communicated in accordance with §

4-20-1

, is unable to be present, he or she shall notify the appointed veterinarian and the animal control officer of the city or town in which the event is taking place and make known to them the name of the person who will replace him or her as the person in charge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 245, § 2.

4-20-7.
Limitations.

The roping of any calf in any rodeo is limited to breakaway calf roping, where the calf is released immediately after it is roped without the animal being subjected to a sudden stop or fall.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 245, § 2.

4-20-8.
Participation.

No person shall participate in any rodeo activity who has been convicted of cruelty to animals while participating in any rodeo.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 245, § 2.

4-20-9.
Penalties for violations.

Whoever violates any provision of this chapter, shall, for each offense be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 245, § 2.